test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_njune_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - saje: # ok NJUNE
    saje+N+Sg+Nom:  saje
    saje+N+Sg+Gen:  saje
    saje+N+Sg+Acc:  saje
    saje+N+Sg+Ill:  sajan
    saje+N+Sg+Loc:  saajeest
    saje+N+Sg+Com:  soojijn #also soijijn  # Matti Morottajain tärhistum
    saje+N+Sg+Abe:  sajettáá
    saje+N+Ess:  saijeen
    saje+N+Par:  saijeed
    saje+N+Pl+Nom:  sajeh
    saje+N+Pl+Gen:  [soojij, sojij]
    saje+N+Pl+Acc:  soojijd
    saje+N+Pl+Ill:  soojijd # MM: j säänist máhđulávt
    saje+N+Pl+Loc:  soojijn
    saje+N+Pl+Com:  [sojijguin, sojijgijn]
    saje+N+Pl+Abe:  sojijttáá

  Noun - mane: # ok NJUNE
    mane+N+Sg+Nom:  mane
    mane+N+Sg+Gen:  mane
    mane+N+Sg+Acc:  mane
    mane+N+Sg+Ill:  manan
    mane+N+Sg+Loc:  maaneest
    mane+N+Sg+Com:  moonijn # MM
    mane+N+Sg+Abe:  manettáá
    mane+N+Ess:  manneen
    mane+N+Par:  manneed
    mane+N+Pl+Nom:  maneh
    mane+N+Pl+Gen:  [moonij, monij]
    mane+N+Pl+Acc:  moonijd
    mane+N+Pl+Ill:  moonijd # MM
    mane+N+Pl+Loc:  moonijn
    mane+N+Pl+Com:  [monijguin, monijgijn]
    mane+N+Pl+Abe:  monijttáá

  Noun - kove: # ok NJUNE
    kove+N+Sg+Nom:  kove 
    kove+N+Sg+Gen:  kove
    kove+N+Sg+Acc:  kove
    kove+N+Sg+Ill:  kován
    kove+N+Sg+Loc:  kooveest
    kove+N+Sg+Com:  kuuvijn # MM & MLO kuvvijn; ILWB IV kuuvijn
    kove+N+Sg+Abe:  kovettáá
    kove+N+Ess:   kovveen
    kove+N+Par:  kovveed
    kove+N+Pl+Nom:  koveh
    kove+N+Pl+Gen:  [kuuvij, kuvij]
    kove+N+Pl+Acc:  kuuvijd
    kove+N+Pl+Ill:  kuuvijd # MM, MLO & ILWB; MM iäpádâs - ill. kuhheeb om Vuoli Ilmarist
    kove+N+Pl+Loc:  kuuvijn
    kove+N+Pl+Com:  [kuvijguin, kuvijgijn]
    kove+N+Pl+Abe:  kuvijttáá

  Noun - njune: # ok NJUNE
    njune+N+Sg+Nom:  njune
    njune+N+Sg+Gen:  njune
    njune+N+Sg+Acc:  njune
    njune+N+Sg+Ill:  njunán
    njune+N+Sg+Loc:  njuuneest
    njune+N+Sg+Com:   njuunijn #MM
    njune+N+Sg+Abe:  njunettáá
    njune+N+Ess:  njunneen
    njune+N+Par:  njunneed
    njune+N+Pl+Nom:  njuneh
    njune+N+Pl+Gen:  [njuunij, njunij]
    njune+N+Pl+Acc:  njuunijd
    njune+N+Pl+Ill:  njuunijd 
    njune+N+Pl+Loc:  njuunijn
    njune+N+Pl+Com:  [njunijguin, njunijgijn]
    njune+N+Pl+Abe:  njunijttáá

    njune+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:  njunnáám
    njune+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:  njuunáán
    njune+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1:  njuunáán
    njune+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:  njunnáád
    njune+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:  njuunáád
    njune+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2:  njuunáád

  Noun - lope: # ok NJUNE
    lope+N+Sg+Nom:  lope
    lope+N+Sg+Gen:  love
    lope+N+Sg+Acc:  love
    lope+N+Sg+Ill:  lopán
    lope+N+Sg+Loc:  looveest
    lope+N+Sg+Com:  luuvijn
    lope+N+Sg+Abe:  lovettáá
    lope+N+Ess:  loppeen
    lope+N+Par:  loppeed
    lope+N+Pl+Nom:  loveh
    lope+N+Pl+Gen:  [luuvij, luvij]
    lope+N+Pl+Acc:  luuvijd
    lope+N+Pl+Ill:  luuvijd
    lope+N+Pl+Loc:  luuvijn
    lope+N+Pl+Com:  [luvijguin, luvijgijn]
    lope+N+Pl+Abe:  luvijttáá

  Noun - kope: # ok NJUNE
    kope+N+Sg+Nom:  kope
    kope+N+Sg+Gen:  kove
    kope+N+Sg+Acc:  kove
    kope+N+Sg+Ill:  kopán
    kope+N+Sg+Loc:  kooveest
    kope+N+Sg+Com:  kuuvijn
    kope+N+Sg+Abe:  kovettáá
    kope+N+Ess:  koppeen
    kope+N+Par:  koppeed
    kope+N+Pl+Nom:  koveh
    kope+N+Pl+Gen:  [kuuvij, kuvij]
    kope+N+Pl+Acc:  kuuvijd
    kope+N+Pl+Ill:  kuuvijd
    kope+N+Pl+Loc:  kuuvijn
    kope+N+Pl+Com:  [kuvijguin, kuvijgijn]
    kope+N+Pl+Abe:  kuvijttáá

  Noun - tupe: # ok NJUNE
    tupe+N+Sg+Nom:  tupe
    tupe+N+Sg+Gen:  tuve
    tupe+N+Sg+Acc:  tuve
    tupe+N+Sg+Ill:  tupán
    tupe+N+Sg+Loc:  tuuveest
    tupe+N+Sg+Com:  tuuvijn
    tupe+N+Sg+Abe:  tuvettáá
    tupe+N+Ess:  tuppeen
    tupe+N+Par:  tuppeed
    tupe+N+Pl+Nom:  tuveh
    tupe+N+Pl+Gen:  [tuuvij, tuvij]
    tupe+N+Pl+Acc:  tuuvijd
    tupe+N+Pl+Ill:  tuuvijd
    tupe+N+Pl+Loc:  tuuvijn
    tupe+N+Pl+Com:  [tuvijguin, tuvijgijn]
    tupe+N+Pl+Abe:  tuvijttáá

  Noun - supe: # ok NJUNE
    supe+N+Sg+Nom:  supe
    supe+N+Sg+Gen:  suve
    supe+N+Sg+Acc:  suve
    supe+N+Sg+Ill:  supán
    supe+N+Sg+Loc:  suuveest
    supe+N+Sg+Com:  suuvijn
    supe+N+Sg+Abe:  suvettáá
    supe+N+Ess:  suppeen
    supe+N+Par:  suppeed
    supe+N+Pl+Nom:  suveh
    supe+N+Pl+Gen:  [suuvij, suvij]
    supe+N+Pl+Acc:  suuvijd
    supe+N+Pl+Ill:  suuvijd
    supe+N+Pl+Loc:  suuvijn
    supe+N+Pl+Com:  [suvijguin, suvijgijn]
    supe+N+Pl+Abe:  suvijttáá

  Noun - mote: # ok NJUNE
    mote+N+Sg+Nom:  mote
    mote+N+Sg+Gen:  mođe
    mote+N+Sg+Acc:  mođe
    mote+N+Sg+Ill:  motán
    mote+N+Sg+Loc:  moođeest
    mote+N+Sg+Com:  muuđijn
    mote+N+Sg+Abe:  mođettáá
    mote+N+Ess:  motteen
    mote+N+Par:  motteed
    mote+N+Pl+Nom:  mođeh
    mote+N+Pl+Gen:  [muuđij, muđij]
    mote+N+Pl+Acc:  muuđijd
    mote+N+Pl+Ill:  muuđijd
    mote+N+Pl+Loc:  muuđijn
    mote+N+Pl+Com:  [muđijguin, muđijgijn]
    mote+N+Pl+Abe:  muđijttáá    
